California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) In addition to any other remedy permitted by law, the commissioner shall have the administrative authority to assess penalties against carriers, insurance producers, and other entities engaged in the business of insurance or other persons or entities for violations of this chapter.

(b) Upon a showing of a violation of this chapter in any civil action, a court may also assess the penalties described in this chapter, in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

(c) Any production agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than a carrier, that violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first violation.

(d) Any production agent or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance, other than a carrier, that engages in practices prohibited by this chapter a second or subsequent time, or who commits a knowing violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

(e) Any carrier that violates this chapter is liable for administrative penalties of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first violation and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each subsequent violation.

(f) Any carrier that violates this chapter with a frequency that indicates a general business practice or commits a knowing violation of this chapter, is liable for administrative penalties of not less than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) and not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation.

(g) An act or omission that is inadvertent and that results in incorrect premium rates being charged to more than one policyholder shall be a single violation for the purpose of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10718.5.

(a) (1) In addition to any other remedy permitted by law, whenever the commissioner shall have reason to believe that any carrier, production agent, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance has violated this chapter, and that a proceeding by the commissioner in respect thereto would be in the interest of the public, the commissioner may issue and serve upon that entity an order to show cause containing a statement of the charges, a statement of the entity’s potential liability under this chapter, and a notice of a public hearing thereon before the Administrative Law Bureau of the department to be held at a time and place fixed therein, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service thereof, for the purpose of determining whether the commissioner should issue an order to that entity to pay the penalty imposed by this chapter and such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order to cease and desist from the specified violations of this chapter.

(2) The hearings provided by this subdivision shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(b) (1) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that irreparable loss and injury has occurred or may occur to an insured, employer, employee, or other member of the public because a carrier, production agent, or other person or entity engaged in the business of insurance has violated this chapter, the commissioner may, before hearing, but after notice and opportunity to submit relevant information, issue and cause to be served upon the entity such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order requiring the entity to forthwith cease and desist from engaging further in the violations which are causing or may cause such irreparable injury.

(2) At the same time an order is served pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall issue and also serve upon the person a notice of public hearing before the Administrative Law Bureau of the department to be held at a time and place fixed therein, which shall not be less than 30 days after the service thereof.

(3) The hearings provided by this subdivision shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(4) At any time prior to the commencement of a hearing as provided in this subdivision, the entity against which the commissioner has served an order may waive the hearing and have judicial review of the order by means of any remedy afforded by law without first exhausting administrative remedies or procedures.

(c) If, after hearing as provided by subdivision (a) or (b), the charges, or any of them, that an entity has violated this chapter are found to be justified, the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served upon that entity an order requiring that entity to pay the penalty imposed by this chapter and such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the alleged violations of this chapter, including, but not limited to, an order to cease and desist from the specified violations of this chapter.

(d) In addition to any other penalty provided by law or the availability of any administrative procedure, if a carrier, after notice and hearing, is found to have violated this chapter knowingly or as a general business practice the commissioner may suspend the carrier’s certificate of authority to transact disability insurance. The order of suspension shall prescribe the period of such suspension. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10718.55.

(a) Carriers may enter into contractual agreements with qualified associations, as defined in subdivision (b), under which these qualified associations may assume responsibility for performing specific administrative services, as defined in this section, for qualified association members. Carriers that enter into agreements with qualified associations for assumption of administrative services shall establish uniform definitions for the administrative services that may be provided by a qualified association or its third-party administrator. The carrier shall permit all qualified associations to assume one or more of these functions when the carrier determines the qualified association demonstrates that it has the administrative capacity to assume these functions.

For the purposes of this section, administrative services provided by qualified associations or their third-party administrators shall be services pertaining to eligibility determination, enrollment, premium collection, sales, or claims administration on a per-claim basis that would otherwise be provided directly by the carrier or through a third-party administrator on a commission basis or an agent or solicitor workforce on a commission basis.

Each carrier that enters into an agreement with any qualified association for the provision of administrative services shall offer all qualified associations with which it contracts the same premium discounts for performing those services the carrier has permitted the qualified association or its third-party administrator to assume. The carrier shall apply these uniform discounts to the carrier’s risk adjusted employee risk rates after the carrier has determined the qualified association’s risk adjusted employee risk rates pursuant to Section 10714. The carrier shall report to the department its schedule of discounts for each administrative service.

In no instance may a carrier provide discounts to qualified associations that are in any way intended to, or materially result in, a reduction in premium charges to the qualified association due to the health status of the membership of the qualified association. In addition to any other remedies available to the commissioner to enforce this chapter, the commissioner may declare a contract between a carrier and a qualified association for administrative services pursuant to this section null and void if the commissioner determines any discounts provided to the qualified association are intended to, or materially result in, a reduction in premium charges to the qualified association due to the health status of the membership of the qualified association.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a qualified association is a nonprofit corporation comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, that conforms to all of the following requirements:

(1) It accepts for membership any individual or small employer meeting its membership criteria.

(2) It does not condition membership, directly or indirectly, on the health or claims history of any person.

(3) It uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association.

(4) It is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance.

(5) It existed on January 1, 1972, and has been in continuous existence since that date.

(6) It has a constitution and bylaws or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members.

(7) It offered, marketed, or sold health coverage to its members for 20 continuous years prior to January 1, 1993.

(8) It agrees to offer any plan contract only to association members.

(9) It agrees to include any member choosing to enroll in the plan contract offered by the association, provided that the member agrees to make required premium payments.

(10) It complies with all provisions of this article.

(11) It had at least 10,000 enrollees covered by association-sponsored plans immediately prior to enactment of Chapter 1128 of the Statutes of 1992.

(12) It applies any administrative cost at an equal rate to all members purchasing coverage through the qualified association.

(c) A qualified association shall comply with the requirements set forth in Section 10198.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 227, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10718.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no provision of this chapter shall be construed to limit the applicability of any other provision of the Insurance Code unless such provision is in conflict with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voluntary Reinsurance Mechanism [10719. - 10729.]

10719.

The California Small Group Reinsurance Fund is hereby authorized to be created solely to allow carriers to share in financing the cost of covering high risk small employer groups. It shall be organized as a nonprofit corporation, which consists of all small employer carriers and small employer health care service plans which elect to participate in the fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10720. These carriers may cede that portion of risk to the fund that the fund has agreed to accept.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10719.1.

Any person or entity subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1062, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.

(a) The fund shall be governed by a board of directors, which shall initially be elected by small employer carriers and small employer health care service plans. The initial board shall be elected by a weighted vote based on net health insurance premiums derived from the state in the previous calendar year in the small employer market. The initial board shall consist of at least five and not more than nine representatives of small employer carriers and small employer health care service plans.

(b) Within 180 days of the election of the initial board, the board shall adopt a plan of operation which provides for the reasonable and equitable administration of the fund.

(c) The plan of operation shall, among other things, do all of the following:

(1) Establish procedures to assure the fair, reasonable, and equitable administration of the fund and provide for the sharing of fund gains or losses on an equitable and proportionate basis.

(2) Establish procedures for handling and accounting of program assets and moneys.

(3) Establish terms of office and procedures for filling vacancies on the board.

(4) Establish procedures for reinsuring risks in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(5) Establish procedures for collecting assessments from members to provide for claims reinsured by the fund and for administrative expenses incurred or estimated to be incurred during the period for which the assessment is made.

(d) Within 60 days of the board’s adoption of the plan of operation, small employer carriers and small employer health care service plans shall elect to be either a participant or nonparticipant of the fund. All participants of the fund shall be members of the fund, and only members of the fund shall continue to be members of the board. Members may elect new members of the board, if necessary, to replace initial board members who elect to be nonparticipants of the fund, subject to subdivision (a). The election shall be binding for a three-year period. Thereafter, each small employer carrier shall notify the board 90 days prior to the end of the election period whether or not they will be a member of the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10720.1.

The fund shall have the general powers and authority granted under the laws of California to insurance companies and health care service plans licensed to transact business, except the power to issue health benefit plans directly to either groups or individuals. In addition, thereto, the fund shall have the specific authority to:

(a) Enter into contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter, including the authority to enter into contracts with similar programs of other states for the joint performance of common functions or with persons or other organizations for the performance of administrative functions.

(b) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal actions necessary or proper for recovering any assessments and penalties for, on behalf of, or against the fund.

(c) Take any legal action necessary to avoid the payment of improper claims against the fund.

(d) Issue reinsurance policies, in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(e) Establish rules, conditions, and procedures pertaining to the reinsurance of members’ risk by the fund.

(f) Establish actuarial functions as appropriate for the operation of the fund.

(g) Assess members of the fund and take advance interim assessments as may be reasonable and necessary for organizational and interim operating expenses. Any interim assessments shall be credited as offsets against any regular assessments due following the close of the fiscal year.

(h) Appoint from among fund members appropriate legal, actuarial, and other committees as necessary to provide technical assistance in the operation of the fund, policy and contract design, and any other function within the authority of the fund.

(i) Borrow money to effect the purposes of the fund. Any notes or other evidence of indebtedness of the fund not in default shall be legal investments for fund members and may be carried as admitted assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10721.

The fund shall provide for the financing of its reinsurance and operating costs, including actuarially sound reserves for unpaid losses, by charging members a reinsurance contribution and, as necessary, making assessments and collections from members in proportion to their participation in the program. Neither the state or any officer, agent, or employee shall be liable for any costs of the fund, or for any debts or liabilities incurred by the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10722.

If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the fund, the excess shall be held at interest and used by the fund to offset future losses or to reduce fund premiums. As used in this paragraph, “future losses” includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10723.

Any unsatisfied net liability or outstanding assessment owed by an insolvent member participating in the fund shall be assumed by and apportioned among the remaining members in the fund in the same manner in which assessments are levied by the fund. The fund shall have all rights allowed by law on behalf of the remaining members against the insolvent member for sums due the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10724.

Carriers choosing to participate shall comply with all requirements for participation established by the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10725.

The fund’s board of directors shall establish the rules, conditions, and procedures pertaining to the reinsurance of members’ risks by the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10726.

Nothing in this article relieves members of participating in the fund from complying with the underwriting and rating provisions included in Article 1 (commencing with Section 10700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 10702) in the case of small employer carriers, or in Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 1357) and with Article 3.14 (commencing with Section 1357.50) of the Health and Safety Code, in the case of small employer health care service plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10727.

The fund shall be exempt from any and all taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10728.

For purposes of agreements entered into pursuant to this article, the fund, and its officers, directors, agents, and employees shall have no liability for any damages other than actual damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10729.

The fund shall establish rules, conditions, and procedures relating to the indemnification of any person or member of the fund made a party to any claim, action, suit, or proceeding because the person or member served on the board of directors of the fund, or on a committee, or was an officer or employee of the fund, provided, such rules, conditions, and procedures do not authorize indemnification in excess of that expressly permitted by Section 317 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Purchasing Pool for Small Employers [10730. - 10750.]

10730.

(a) The Voluntary Alliance Uniting Employers Purchasing Program is hereby created and shall be administered by the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board.

(b) No member of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board and no decisionmaker for any nonprofit entity that assumes administrative and fiscal responsibility for operation of the program pursuant to Sections 10748.5 and 10748.6 shall make, participate in making, or in any way attempt to use his or her official position to influence the making of any decision that he or she knows or has reason to know will have a reasonably foreseeable material financial effect, distinguishable from its effect on the public generally, on him or her or a member of his or her immediate family, or on any of the following:

(1) Any source of income, other than gifts and other than loans by a commercial lending institution in the regular course of business on terms available to the public without regard to official status aggregating two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more in value provided to, received by, or promised to the member of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board or decisionmaker for a nonprofit entity that assumes administrative and fiscal responsibility for operation of the program pursuant to Sections 10748.5 and 10748.6 within 12 months prior to the time when the decision is made.

(2) Any business entity in which the member of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board or decisionmaker for a nonprofit entity that assumes administrative and fiscal responsibility for operation of the program pursuant to Sections 10748.5 and 10748.6 is a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee, or holds any position of management.

(c) Commencing January 1, 1994, no member of the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board and no decisionmaker for any nonprofit entity that assumes administrative and fiscal responsibility for the program pursuant to Sections 10748.5 and 10748.6, may be an employee, a consultant or a member of the board of directors of any insurer, hospital service plan or health care service plan, or an insurance broker or agent doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10731.

The board may do any of the following:

(a) Enter into contracts with carriers to provide health benefits coverage to eligible employees and their dependents. Any contract entered into pursuant to this part shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. The board shall not be required to specify the amounts encumbered for each contract, but may allocate funds to each contract based on projected and actual subscriber enrollments.

(b) Enter into other contracts as are necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this part.

(c) Employ necessary staff.

(d) Sue or be sued, including taking any legal actions necessary or proper for recovering any penalties for, on behalf of, or against, the program or any board member.

(e) Define the health benefits coverage which the program will contract to purchase from participating carriers.

(f) Appoint committees, as necessary, to provide technical assistance in the operation of the program.

(g) Assess participating employers a reasonable fee for necessary costs in connection with the program.

(h) Undertake activities necessary to administer the program, including marketing and publicizing the program, and assuring carrier, employer, and enrollee compliance with program requirements.

(i) Establish rules, conditions, and procedures for participation for small employers.

(j) Establish rules, conditions, and procedures for participation for participating carriers.

(k) Establish a financial relationship directly with agents or brokers to provide services pursuant to this program.

(l) Approve the benefit plan designs sold by carriers participating in the pool.

(m) Issue rules and regulations as necessary to administer the program. Any rules and regulations issued pursuant to this subdivision may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Until December 31, 1994, the adoption of these regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.

(n) Exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed by this part.

(o) From money appropriated to the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund, the Major Risk Medical Insurance Board may loan funds for operating expenses to establish the program. These funds shall be repaid to the Major Risk Medical Insurance Fund prior to transitioning administrative and financial responsibility for the program to a qualified nonprofit entity pursuant to Sections 10748.5 and 10748.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1146, Sec. 9.7.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10731.2.

Any person or entity subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1062, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10732.

The board shall establish geographic areas within which participating carriers may offer health coverage to eligible employees and dependents.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.

On or after the effective date of this chapter, the board shall enter into contracts with carriers for the purpose of providing health benefits coverage to eligible employees and dependents. Participating carriers shall have, but need not be limited to, all of the following operating characteristics satisfactory to the board:

(a) Strong financial condition, including the ability to assume the risk of providing and paying for covered services. A participating carrier may utilize reinsurance, provider risk sharing, and other appropriate mechanisms to share a portion of the risk.

(b) Adequate administrative management.

(c) In the case of the health care service plan, the following requirements must be met: (1) on the effective date of the contract, the health care service plan must be in compliance with the minimum tangible net equity requirements of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care as those requirements will be in effect on January 1, 1995, and must remain in compliance with these requirements throughout the duration of the contract; (2) (A) before the effective date of the contract, the health care service plan must have devised a system for identifying in a simple and clear fashion both in its own records and in the medical records of subscribers and enrollees the fact that the services provided are provided under the program; and (B) throughout the duration of the contract, the health care service plan must use that system; and (3) at least 30 days before the effective date of any contract with the board, the health care service plan must inform the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care in writing of the health care service plan’s intent to enter into the contract and must demonstrate in that letter, to the satisfaction of the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, that it has complied with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2).

(d) A satisfactory grievance procedure.

(e) Participating carriers that contract with or employ health care providers shall have mechanisms to accomplish all of the following, in a manner satisfactory to the board, in consultation with the carrier’s licensing agency.

(1) Review the quality of care covered.

(2) Review the appropriateness of care covered.

(3) Provide accessible health care services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10733.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employer purchasing coverage through the program shall not be determined to be no longer eligible to participate in the program solely because the employer employs more than 50 eligible employees, provided the employer employs no more than 100 eligible employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1146, Sec. 10.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10734.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall not be subject to licensure or regulation by the Department of Insurance or the Department of Managed Health Care, as the case may be.

(b) Participating carriers that contract with the program shall be licensed and in good standing with their licensing agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 857, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10735.

The board shall contract with a broad range of carriers in an area, if available, to ensure that enrollees have a choice from among a reasonable number and types of competing carriers. The board shall develop and make available objective criteria for carrier selection and provide adequate notice of the application process to permit all carriers a reasonable and fair opportunity to participate. The criteria and application process shall allow participating carriers to comply with their state and federal licensing and regulatory obligations, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Carrier selection shall be based on the criteria developed by the board.

The administrator shall not eliminate any carrier from selection solely because of the carrier’s size or limited service area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10737.

The board shall use appropriate and efficient means to notify small employers of the availability of sponsored health coverage from the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10738.

The board shall make available to small employers marketing materials that accurately summarize the benefits plans and rates that are offered by the carrier through the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10739.

Unless authorized by the board, no participating carrier shall, in an area served by the program, directly, or through an employee, agent, or contractor, provide a small group or enrollee with any marketing material relating to benefits or rates provided under the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10740.

Participating carriers may contract with agents or brokers to provide marketing and servicing of health benefits coverage offered through the program. Any commissions set and paid pursuant to this section shall be determined by the participating carrier and the agent or broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10741.

The board shall enforce conditions of participation in the program for small employers and enrollees which shall conform with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10742.

The board shall establish a mechanism to collect premiums from small employers, including remittance of the share of the premium paid by the enrollee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10743.

The board may prohibit employers or employees who drop coverage after enrolling in the pool from reenrolling in the program for up to 12 months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10744.

The board shall arrange to pay contractors as specified in program contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10745.

The board shall pay participating carriers their contracted rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10746.

Participating carriers shall offer rates to small employers or enrollees in the program that, at a minimum, are consistent with the program regulations and existing statutes and regulations regulating health insurance offerings to small employers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10747.

The board may adjust payments made to a carrier if the board finds that the carrier has a significantly disproportionate share of high- or low-risk enrollees. Prior to making this finding, the program shall obtain valid data from participating carriers. Reporting requirements shall be administratively compatible with the methods of operation of the carrier. Any adjustments to payments shall be prospective and shall utilize demographic and other factors which are actuarially related to risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10748.

If a small employer, employee, or dependent of a small employer is dissatisfied with any action or failure to act which has occurred in connection with eligibility for, or enrollment in the program, the employer or employee shall have the right to appeal to the board and shall be accorded an opportunity for a fair hearing. Hearings shall be conducted, insofar as practicable, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10748.5.

No later than three years from the effective date of this article, the board shall issue a request for proposals that solicits nonprofit entities to submit bids to assume administrative and fiscal responsibility for operation of the program on a regional basis. The geographic boundaries of the regions shall be designated by the board. The board shall assess bidder’s qualifications in the areas of administrative capacity, financial responsibility, local experience, and demonstrated ability.

Within six months of issuing the request for proposals, the board shall select from among the qualified bidders and award administrative and financial responsibility for the program to the selected regional nonprofit entities. If no qualified nonprofit entity submits a bid pursuant to the board’s request for proposals, one year from the date that bids were due the board shall reissue a request for proposals if the board has reason to believe that there is a possibility for a response from a qualified nonprofit entity.

The board shall provide for an orderly transition of administrative and financial responsibility for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10748.6.

The board shall accept and review proposals submitted from nonprofit entities for assumption of administrative and financial responsibility of the program at any time prior to the process described in Section 10748.5. If the board determines that a qualified entity exists, the board may relinquish administrative and financial responsibility for the program to the nonprofit entity. Any contract entered into pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any provision of law relating to competitive bidding and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10748.7.

There is in the program a five-member small employer advisory panel to be appointed by the board to provide consultation to the board on program design and implementation. The composition of the panel shall reflect varying sizes of small employers and a variety of occupational categories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10749.

There is created a Voluntary Alliance Uniting Employers Fund which shall consist of moneys collected pursuant to this article and any funds loaned by the board for operating expenses. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year, to the board for the purposes specified in this part. Costs of the Voluntary Alliance for Uniting Employers Purchasing Program shall not be paid with state funds other than funds loaned by the board for operating expenses. Moneys within the fund shall be utilized for the purposes of this article.
